Tennessee, session 114, SB0393.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-246(a) is amended by deleting
subdivision (34).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-248, is amended by inserting
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) Professional music therapy advisory committee of the board of examiners in
psychology, created by § 63-11-601;
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0393
002385
- 1 -